Hawaii statutes.
§40-13 Regulations. In conformity with
chapter 91, the comptroller may make such regulations not inconsistent with
this chapter as may be found necessary to carry out the object and provisions
of this chapter, and for the more effectual record, check, and audit of all
receipts and disbursements of public moneys. These regulations shall have the
force and effect of law. [L 1898, c 39, §33; RL 1925, §1433; RL 1935, §558; RL
1945, §1560; RL 1955, §34-9; am L 1957, c 152, §1; HRS §40-13]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next